Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3607
Fee; rules.

(a) A member state issuing an expedited license authorizing the practice of medicine in that state may impose a fee for a license issued or renewed through the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact.

(b) The interstate commission is authorized to develop rules regarding fees for expedited licenses.

Laws 2017, LB88, § 7.